Washington statutes.
RCW 36.01.170

Administration of trusts benefiting school districts.

Any county authorized by territorial law to administer moneys held in trust for the benefit of school districts within the county, which moneys were bequeathed for such purposes by testamentary provision, may dissolve any trust, the corpus of which does not exceed fifty thousand dollars, and distribute any moneys remaining in the trust to school districts within the county. Before dissolving the trust, the county must adopt a resolution finding that conditions have changed and it is no longer feasible for the county to administer the trust.

[ 1998 c 65 s 1.]